Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.180

Jurisdiction of courts.

The superior courts are hereby vested with jurisdiction to enforce this chapter and to prevent and restrain violations thereof.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.44.180. Prior: 1939 c 219 s 15; RRS s 6266-15.]